NodeJsProjects/SpellChecker/Dictionaries/sk_SK/sk_SK.aff
SFX Z Y 157     # vzor žena množné číslo
SFX Z   a           í          [euo]a
SFX Z   ka          k          [^áéíóúýô].oka
SFX Z   ta          t          orta
SFX Z   va          v          [^áéíóúýô].ova
SFX Z   la          l          iela
SFX Z   a           0          [áéíóúŕýô].a
SFX Z   a           0          áuka
SFX Z   a           0          [i][aeu][^dnl]a
SFX Z   a           0          yena
SFX Z   a           0          ie.[^kd]a
SFX Z   a           0          [áéíóúýô][^hzž][^kbe]a
SFX Z   a           0          ŕ...[^kl]a
SFX Z   a           0          i[eua].[ayou][bdv]a
SFX Z   a           0          [áéíóúýŕô].[eiayuol].a
SFX Z   a           0          ia[tč]ina
SFX Z   a           0          ázda
SFX Z   a           0          [áéíóúýô][^áéíóúýô]čina
SFX Z   a           0          [^šo].ola
SFX Z   a           0          [áéíóúýô][hknsšvz][artd][auio][dtnb]a
SFX Z   a           0          ie[hnprsv][čňrt][aie][dnlv]a
SFX Z   a           0          áľanda
SFX Z   a           0          [úlač][seámu][fptv]ora
SFX Z   a           0          tvora
SFX Z   a           0          [áéíóúý][^áéíóúýp][^iľň]ava
SFX Z   a           0          iemota
SFX Z   a           0          [ýá]straha
SFX Z   a           0          ávlaha
SFX Z   a           0          [^e][^g]enda
SFX Z   ra          er         [úý]hra
SFX Z   va          ev         [úý][zž]va
SFX Z   aba         áb         laba
SFX Z   ala         ál         iala
SFX Z   aha         áh         [^áéíóúýv][^ir]aha
SFX Z   ata         át         [^áéíóúý].[^iš]ata
SFX Z   ava         áv         [^áéíóúý][^áéíóúýŕp][^iľň]ava
SFX Z   ada         ád         [^i][aeiouy].ada
SFX Z   ada         ád         [iom][bhz]rada
SFX Z   ada         ád         a[mh][bň]ada
SFX Z   ica         íc         ivica
SFX Z   ba          ob         ia.ba
SFX Z   ba          ob         [áéíóúýô].ba
SFX Z   ata         iat        šata
SFX Z   oba         ôb         [^rzeéíáýúôó][^j]oba
SFX Z   ota         ôt         [^iéíáýúôóŕĺ][^éíáýúôó][^d]ota
SFX Z   oda         ôd         [^éíáýúôóŕĺ].oda
SFX Z   oha         ôh         [^áéíóúý]loha
SFX Z   ola         ôl         škola
SFX Z   ola         ôl         odola
SFX Z   ora         ôr         [hkm]ora
SFX Z   ora         ôr         [od]pora
SFX Z   ka          ok         [^f]i[ea].ka
SFX Z   ka          ok         [áéíóúýôŕ][^u]ka
SFX Z   ka          ok         [aieo]jka
SFX Z   ka          ok         [áéíóúýôŕ]stka
SFX Z   ka          ok         i[eau]stka
SFX Z   ka          ok         ientka
SFX Z   ka          iek        iantka
SFX Z   ka          ok         ádzka
SFX Z   äta         iat        äta
SFX Z   aba         iab        žaba
SFX Z   ba          ieb        [^t][rns]ba
SFX Z   ba          ieb        [^i].tba
SFX Z   ba          ieb        [^ú][vzž]ba
SFX Z   eda         ied        [^i]eda
SFX Z   eba         ieb        [^i]eba
SFX Z   ra          ier        [hd]ra
SFX Z   va          iev        [kštzž]va
SFX Z   va          iev        arva
SFX Z   ľva         liev       ľva
SFX Z   ľba         lieb       [aeo]ľba
SFX Z   ilba        ílb        ilba
SFX Z   dba         dieb       [auo]dba
SFX Z   ďka         diek       [^i][^éíóôúý]ďka
SFX Z   ňka         niek       [^i][^éíóôúý]ňka
SFX Z   ťka         tiek       [^i][^éíóôúý]ťka
SFX Z   arta        árt        arta
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^i][lr][fdcčš]ka
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^i][aeiuy][bcčdfghklmoprsštvzž]ka
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^i][aeuiy][sn]tka
SFX Z   ka          iek        o[bcčdfghklmnoprsštvzž]ka
SFX Z   ka          iek        [lr]nka
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^i][eiuy]nka
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^ib]anka
SFX Z   ľka         liek       [^i][aeouy]ľka
SFX Z   eta         iet        [^p][^o][^iu]eta
SFX Z   alva        álv        alva
SFX Z   rva         ŕv         [bmt]rva
SFX Z   rba         ŕb         trba
SFX Z   aba         áb         baba
SFX Z   iba         íb         iba
SFX Z   uda         úd         uda
SFX Z   iha         íh         iha
SFX Z   ika         ík         [^éíáýúôó].ika
SFX Z   ila         íl         [^a]ila
SFX Z   ita         ít         [^i][aeiouy].ita
SFX Z   ina         ín         [^i][äaeiouy].ina
SFX Z   ina         ín         [^i][aoley][bhjlnrtv]čina
SFX Z   ina         ín         [^a][bcčdhrkjrndďtvzž][clmnpšrvz]ina
SFX Z   elta        ielt       [^i]elta
SFX Z   ela         iel        [^dilnrtu]ela
SFX Z   esta        iest       [^d][^i]esta
SFX Z   enda        iend       egenda
SFX Z   ena         ien        [^mty]ena
SFX Z   ena         ien        [^éíáýúôó]mena
SFX Z   ma          iem        [^i]erma
SFX Z   anda        ánd        [^á].anda
SFX Z   arda        árd        arda
SFX Z   amba        ámb        amba
SFX Z   imba        ímb        imba
SFX Z   omba        ômb        [^l]omba
SFX Z   umba        úmb        umba
SFX Z   unda        únd        unda
SFX Z   rnda        ŕnd        rnda
SFX Z   avda        ávd        avda
SFX Z   ažda        ážd        ažda
SFX Z   abzda       ábzd       abzda
SFX Z   azda        ázd        azda
SFX Z   auna        áun        auna
SFX Z   uka         úk         [^éíáýúôó][^á]uka
SFX Z   una         ún         [dklr]una
SFX Z   ula         úl         [^a]ula
SFX Z   yba         ýb         [^e][hr]yba
SFX Z   anka        ánk        [^d]banka
SFX Z   ucha        úch        ucha
SFX Z   0           m          [áéíóŕúýô].a
SFX Z   0           m          i[aeu].a
SFX Z   0           m          [áéíóŕúýô][dps][ctz][hk]a
SFX Z   0           m          ácha
SFX Z   0           m          i[eau][bcčdlľnmprsštťvzž][bdghkt]a
SFX Z   0           m          i[eau][sn]tka
SFX Z   0           m          [áéíóĺŕúýô][bcčdďfghjklľmnprsštťvzž][bcčdďfghjklľmnprsštvzž]a
SFX Z   a           ám         [euo]a
SFX Z   a           ám         [^i][aeiyouä].a
SFX Z   a           ám         iola
SFX Z   a           ám         io[nrštv]ka
SFX Z   a           ám         ámlka
SFX Z   a           ám         [aeuoiyä][brs][ckrt][hmn]a
SFX Z   a           ám         [bčdfkmprsštv][klrstv][cčknrstvzž][bdhkmntv]a
SFX Z   a           ám         [^i][aeuoiyä][bcčdďfghjklľmnprsštťvxzž][bcčdďfghjklľmnňprsštvxzž]a
SFX Z   a           ám         [^iť][aeuoiyä][bcčdďfghjklľmnprsštvxzž][bcčdďfghjklľmnprsštvxzž][bcčdďfghjklľmnprsštvxzž]a
SFX Z   0           ch         [áéíóŕúýô].a
SFX Z   0           ch         i[aeu].a
SFX Z   0           ch         [áéíóŕúýô][dps][ctz][hk]a
SFX Z   0           ch         ácha
SFX Z   0           ch         i[eau][bcčdlľnmprsštťvzž][bdghkt]a
SFX Z   0           ch         i[eau][sn]tka
SFX Z   0           ch         [áéíóĺŕúýô][bcčdďfghjklľmnprsštťvzž][bcčdďfghjklľmnprsštvzž]a
SFX Z   a           ách        [euo]a
SFX Z   a           ách        [^i][aeiyouä].a
SFX Z   a           ách        iola
SFX Z   a           ách        io[nrštv]ka
SFX Z   a           ách        ámlka
SFX Z   a           ách        [aeuoiyä][brs][ckrt][hmn]a
SFX Z   a           ách        [bčdfkmprsštv][klrstv][cčknrstvzž][bdhkmntv]a
SFX Z   a           ách        [^i][aeuoiyä][bcčdďfghjklľmnprsštťvxzž][bcčdďfghjklľmnňprsštvxzž]a
SFX Z   a           ách        [^iť][aeuoiyä][bcčdďfghjklľmnprsštvxzž][bcčdďfghjklľmnprsštvxzž][bcčdďfghjklľmnprsštvxzž]a
SFX Z   a           ami        a
